Utah statutes.
73-13-9.   Ratification of compact.

The Upper Colorado River Basin Compact entered into at Santa Fe, New Mexico, on October 11, 1948, by the Upper Colorado River Basin States, namely, Arizona, Colorado, New Mexico, Utah and Wyoming, by the representatives of those states, with the approval of the representative of the United States of America, is hereby unconditionally ratified, approved and confirmed for and by the state of Utah.

